Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE C. SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7218. JONAH WATER SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7218.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Jonah Water Special Utility District.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 7218.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district is governed by a board of nine directors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 7218.052. DIRECTOR ELIGIBILITY. To be eligible to be listed on the ballot as a candidate for or to serve as a director, a person must be:

(1) a resident of the district; and

(2) a retail water or sewer service customer of the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 7218.053. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS FROM SINGLE-MEMBER DISTRICTS. (a) The board by rule may provide for the election of some or all of the directors from single-member districts.

(b) In addition to the qualifications required by Section 7218.052, if the board provides for the election of some or all of the directors from single-member districts, to be eligible to be listed on the ballot as a candidate for or to serve as a director from a single-member district, a person must be a resident of that district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 877 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.